Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-201.01
Extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction or authority; exercise outside of county.

Any extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction or authority which a city of the primary class may exercise outside of its corporate limits by authority of state law may be exercised by such city outside of the county in which such city is located.

Laws 1967, c. 75, § 7, p. 242;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 22.